Utah statutes.
59-2-916.   Tax for development of Colorado River Water Project.
The governing body of each county, town, city, conservation district, and
metropolitan district may levy a tax for participation in the development of
the use of Colorado river water in Utah through the Colorado River-Great Basin
Project. The tax shall be levied at the same time and collected in the same
manner as other taxes.
